Nebraska, session 109, LB450.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB450 LB450
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 13-3202, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-3202 The Legislature finds that:
(1) Energy efficiency, grid resiliency, and the use of renewable
energy are important for preserving the health and economic well-being of
Nebraska’s citizens. Using less energy decreases the cost of living and
keeps the cost of public power low by delaying the need for additional
power plants. By building the market for energy efficiency, grid
resiliency, and renewable energy products, economic development will be
encouraged and new jobs will be created for Nebraskans in the energy
efficiency, grid resiliency, and renewable energy job sectors;
(2) To further these goals, the state should promote energy
efficiency improvements, grid resiliency improvements, and renewable
energy systems;
(3) The upfront costs for energy efficiency improvements, grid
resiliency improvements, and renewable energy systems prohibit many
property owners from making improvements. Therefore, it is necessary to
authorize municipalities to implement an alternative financing method
through the creation of clean energy assessment districts; and
(4) Public purposes will be served by providing municipalities with
the authority to finance the installation of energy efficiency
improvements, grid resiliency improvements, and renewable energy systems
through the creation of clean energy assessment districts. Such public
purposes include, but are not limited to, reduced energy and water costs,
reduced greenhouse gas emissions, economic stimulation and development,
improved property valuation, and increased employment.
Sec. 2. Section 13-3203, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-3203 For purposes of the Property Assessed Clean Energy Act:
(1) Assessment contract means a contract entered into between a
municipality, a property owner, and, if applicable, a third-party lender
-2-

LB450 LB450
2025 2025
under which the municipality agrees to provide financing for an energy
project in exchange for a property owner’s agreement to pay an annual
assessment for a period not to exceed the weighted average useful life of
the energy project;
(2) Clean energy assessment district means a district created by a
municipality to provide financing for energy projects;
(3) Energy efficiency improvement means any acquisition,
installation, or modification benefiting publicly or privately owned
property that is designed to reduce the electric, gas, water, or other
utility demand or consumption of the buildings on, or to be constructed
on, such property or to promote the efficient and effective management of
natural resources or storm water, including, but not limited to:
(a) Insulation in walls, roofs, floors, foundations, or heating and
cooling distribution systems;
(b) Storm windows and doors; multiglazed windows and doors; heat-
absorbing or heat-reflective glazed and coated window and door systems;
and additional glazing, reductions in glass area, and other window and
door system modifications that reduce energy consumption;
(c) Automated energy control systems;
(d) Heating, ventilating, or air conditioning and distribution
system modifications or replacements;
(e) Caulking, weatherstripping, and air sealing;
(f) Replacement or modification of lighting fixtures to reduce the
energy use of the lighting system;
(g) Energy recovery systems, including, but not limited to,
cogeneration and trigeneration systems;
(h) Daylighting systems;
(i) Installation or upgrade of electrical wiring or outlets to
charge a motor vehicle that is fully or partially powered by electricity;
(j) Facilities providing for water conservation or pollutant
control;
-3-

LB450 LB450
2025 2025
(k) Roofs designed to reduce energy consumption or support
additional loads necessitated by other energy efficiency improvements;
(l) Installation of energy-efficient fixtures, including, but not
limited to, water heating systems, escalators, and elevators;
(m) Energy efficiency related items if so long as the cost of the
energy efficiency related items financed by the municipality does not
exceed twenty-five percent of the total cost of the energy project; and
(n) Any other installation or modification of equipment, devices, or
materials approved as a utility cost-saving measure by the municipality;
(4) Energy efficiency related item means any repair, replacement,
improvement, or modification to real property that is necessary or
desirable in conjunction with an energy efficiency improvement,
including, but not limited to, structural support improvements and the
repair or replacement of any building components, paved surfaces, or
fixtures disrupted or altered by the installation of an energy efficiency
improvement;
(5) Energy project means the installation or modification of an
energy efficiency improvement or grid resiliency improvement or the
acquisition, installation, or improvement of a renewable energy system;
(6) Grid resiliency improvement means any acquisition, installation,
or modification benefiting publicly or privately owned property that is
designed to anticipate, prepare for, withstand, respond to, and rapidly
recover from major power disruptions, including, but not limited to:
(a) Backup power generators;
(b) Backup power generators powered by renewable energy resources;
(c) Solar panels with battery storage; and
(d) Smart grid technology;
(7) (6) Municipality means any county, city, or village in this
state;
(8) (7) Qualifying property means any of the following types of
property located within a municipality:
-4-

LB450 LB450
2025 2025
(a) Agricultural property;
(b) Commercial property, including multifamily residential property
comprised of more than four dwelling units;
(c) Industrial property; or
(d) Single-family residential property, which may include up to four
dwelling units;
(9)(a) (8)(a) Renewable energy resource means a resource that
naturally replenishes over time and that minimizes the output of toxic
material in the conversion to energy. Renewable energy resource includes,
but is not limited to, the following:
(i) Nonhazardous biomass;
(ii) Solar and solar thermal energy;
(iii) Wind energy;
(iv) Geothermal energy;
(v) Methane gas captured from a landfill or elsewhere; and
(vi) Photovoltaic systems; and
(b) Renewable energy resource does not include petroleum, nuclear
power, natural gas, coal, or hazardous biomass; and
(10) (9) Renewable energy system means a fixture, product, device,
or interacting group of fixtures, products, or devices on the customer's
side of the meter that uses one or more renewable energy resources to
generate electricity. Renewable energy system includes a biomass stove
but does not include an incinerator.
Sec. 3. Section 13-3204, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-3204 (1) Pursuant to the procedures provided in this section, a
municipality may, from time to time, create one or more clean energy
assessment districts. Such districts may be separate, overlapping, or
coterminous and may be created anywhere within the municipality or its
extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction, except that a county shall not
create a district that includes any area within the corporate boundaries
-5-

LB450 LB450
2025 2025
or extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of any city or village located in
whole or in part within such county. The governing body of the
municipality shall be the governing body for any district so created.
(2) Prior to creating any clean energy assessment district, the
municipality shall hold a public hearing at which the public may comment
on the creation of such district. Notice of the public hearing shall be
given by publication in a legal newspaper in, or of, general circulation
in the municipality at least ten days prior to the hearing.
(3) After the public hearing, the municipality may create a clean
energy assessment district by ordinance or, for counties, by resolution.
The ordinance or resolution shall include:
(a) A finding that the financing of energy projects is a valid
public purpose;
(b) A contract form to be used for assessment contracts between the
municipality, the owner of the qualifying property, and, if applicable, a
third-party lender governing the terms and conditions of financing and
annual assessments;
(c) Identification of an official authorized to enter into
assessment contracts on behalf of the municipality;
(d) An application process and eligibility requirements for
financing energy projects;
(e) An explanation of how annual assessments will be made and
collected;
(f) For energy projects involving residential property, a
requirement that any interest rate on assessment installments must be a
fixed rate;
(g) For energy projects involving residential property, a
requirement that the repayment period for assessments must be according
to a fixed repayment schedule;
(h) Information regarding the following, to the extent known, or
procedures to determine the following in the future:
-6-

LB450 LB450
2025 2025
(i) Provisions for an adequate debt service reserve fund created
under section 13-3209, if applicable;
(ii) Provisions for an adequate loss reserve fund created under
section 13-3208; and
(iii) Any application, administration, or other program fees to be
charged to owners participating in the program that will be used to
finance costs incurred by the municipality as a result of the program;
(i) A requirement that the term of the annual assessments not exceed
the weighted average useful life of the energy project paid for by the
annual assessments;
(j) A requirement that any energy efficiency improvement that is not
permanently affixed to the qualifying property upon which an annual
assessment is imposed to repay the cost of such energy efficiency
improvement shall must be conveyed with the qualifying property if a
transfer of ownership of the qualifying property occurs;
(k) A requirement that, prior to the effective date of any contract
that binds the purchaser to purchase qualifying property upon which an
annual assessment is imposed, the owner shall provide notice to the
purchaser that the purchaser assumes responsibility for payment of the
annual assessment as provided in subdivision (3)(d) of section 13-3205;
(l) Provisions for marketing and participant education;
(m) A requirement that the municipality obtain verification that the
renewable energy system, grid resiliency improvement, or energy
efficiency improvement was properly installed and is operating as
intended; and
(n) A requirement that the clean energy assessment district, with
respect to single-family residential property, comply with the Property
Assessed Clean Energy Act and with directives or guidelines issued by the
Federal Housing Administration and the Federal Housing Finance Agency on
or after January 1, 2016, relating to property assessed clean energy
financing.
-7-

LB450 LB450
2025 2025
Sec. 4. Original sections 13-3202, 13-3203, and 13-3204, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-8-